Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Chapter 07. Executive Budget Act.

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 37.35.
Renumbered in 1970.

Sec. 37.07.010.
Statement of policy.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a comprehensive system for state program and financial management that furthers the capacity of the governor and legislature to plan and finance the services that they determine the state will provide for its citizens. The system must include procedures for

the orderly establishment, continuing review, and periodic revision of the program goals and policies of state agencies and financial goals and policies of the state;

the development, coordination, and review of long-range program and financial plans that will implement established state goals and policies;

the preparation, coordination, analysis, and enactment of a budget that is organized to focus on the services provided by state agencies and on the cost of those services and that provides for implementation of policies and plans, in the succeeding budget period;

the evaluation of alternatives to existing policies, plans, and procedures that offer potential for more efficient state services;

the regular appraisal and reporting of program performance;

public participation in the development of the annual budget, including opportunity for the public to review and comment upon the plans and programs of the Office of the Governor and all state agencies in the executive branch, the legislature, the judicial system, the University of Alaska, and the public corporations of the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 2 ch 168 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 2 SLA 1982)

Cross references. —

For constitutional provisions as to budget, see Alaska Const., art. IX, § 12.

Sec. 37.07.014.
Responsibilities of the legislature.

To carry out its legislative power under art. II, sec. 1, Constitution of the State of Alaska, and to promote results-based government, the legislature shall issue a mission statement for each agency and the desired results the agency should achieve. The legislature may issue a separate mission statement for a subunit of an agency. A mission statement and desired results should promote the efficient, measured use of the state’s resources. A mission statement and desired results constitute policy under which an agency shall operate, and, where appropriate, the mission statement may be implemented by statute.

The legislature shall provide for a budget review function that promotes results-based government. The legislature shall adopt a method of measuring results for each agency, and measurements shall be reported semi-annually by each agency to the legislature. The reports shall be used by the legislature to evaluate whether the mission and desired results for that agency or subunit of the agency are being achieved.

The legislature shall analyze the comprehensive operating and capital improvements programs and financial plans recommended by the governor.

To foster results-based government, to carry out the mission statements, and to obtain desired results, the legislature shall authorize the comprehensive operating and capital improvements programs and financial plans. The legislature shall allocate the state’s resources for effective and efficient delivery of public services by

clearly identifying desired results;

setting priorities;

assigning accountability; and

using methods for measuring, reporting, and evaluating results.

The legislature shall

provide for a post-audit function to cover financial transactions, program accomplishment, and compliance with legislative intent;

adopt or revise the estimate of receipts required to balance the succeeding fiscal year’s budget in order that proposed expenditures do not exceed estimated receipts for that fiscal year;

adopt, revise, or initiate revenue measures in order to balance the succeeding fiscal year’s budget and the capital improvements section of the budget for the succeeding six years.

To help fulfill the legislature’s responsibilities under this section and achieve results-based government, each agency shall

allocate resources to achieve the mission and desired results established by the legislature;

express desired results established by the legislature and other program results in measurable terms;

measure progress towards mission statements and desired results established by the legislature and other results;

promote activities consistent with mission statements and desired results established by the legislature that reduce or avoid future costs;

plan for the short-term and the long-term using consistent assumptions for major demographic and other trends; and

require accountability at all levels for meeting program mission statements and desired results established by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1998)

Sec. 37.07.016.
Governor’s use of mission statements.

To carry out the executive power under art. III, sec. 1 and sec. 16, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the governor shall use the mission statements and desired results issued by the legislature as a guide to implement and execute the law. The governor shall assure that each agency complies with the mission statement and achieves the desired results identified by the legislature.

History.

(§ 1 ch 27 SLA 1998)

Sec. 37.07.020.
Responsibilities of the governor.

The governor shall prepare a budget for the succeeding fiscal year that must cover all estimated receipts, including all grants, loans, and money received from the federal government and all proposed expenditures of the state government. The budget shall be organized so that the proposed expenditures for each agency are presented separately. The budget must be accompanied by the information required under AS

37.07.050

and by the following separate bills: (1) an appropriation bill authorizing the operating and capital expenditures of the state’s integrated comprehensive mental health program under AS

37.14.003(a)

; (2) an appropriation bill authorizing state operating expenditures other than those included in the state’s integrated comprehensive mental health program; (3) an appropriation bill authorizing capital expenditures other than those included in the state’s integrated comprehensive mental health program; and (4) a bill or bills covering recommendations, if any, in the budget for new or additional revenue. The budget for the succeeding fiscal year and each of the bills shall become public information on December 15 at which time the governor shall submit copies to the legislature and make copies available to the public. The bills, identical in content to the copies released on December 15, shall be delivered to the rules committee of each house before the fourth legislative day of the next regular session for introduction.

In addition to the budget and bills submitted under (a) of this section, the governor shall submit a capital improvements program covering the succeeding six fiscal years. The governor shall also submit a fiscal plan with estimates of significant sources and uses of funds for the succeeding 10 fiscal years. The fiscal plan

must include sufficient details to identify

significant sources of funds;

significant uses of funds, including lump sum projections of

operating expenditures;

capital expenditures;

debt service expenditures;

fund capitalizations;

appropriations of income of the Alaska permanent fund (art. IX, sec. 15, Constitution of the State of Alaska), if any;

must balance sources and uses of funds held while providing for essential state services and protecting the economic stability of the state;

must include projected balances of significant funds held in separate accounts, including the budget reserve fund (art. IX, sec. 17, Constitution of the State of Alaska), the public education fund (AS

14.17.300

), and the Alaska capital income fund (AS

37.05.565

);

must set out significant assumptions used in the projections with sufficient detail to enable the legislature to rely on the fiscal plan in understanding, evaluating, and resolving issues of state budgeting, including information that supports major areas of operating increases, such as population demographics that affect the need for particular government services.

Proposed expenditures may not exceed estimated revenue for the succeeding fiscal year. The expenditures proposed in the six-year capital improvements program may not exceed the estimated revenue and bond authorizations passed and proposed.

[Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

The budget prepared under (a) of this section must present the proposed operating expenditures for each agency for annual facility operations, annual maintenance and repair, and periodic renewal and replacement for components of public buildings and facilities separately from the other proposed operating expenditures by the agency. Proposed annual appropriations for an agency’s facility operations, maintenance and repair, and renewal and replacement for components of public buildings and facilities contained in an appropriation bill prepared under (a) of this section must be presented separately from appropriations for other proposed operating expenditures by the agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 18 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 2 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 1984; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am §§ 4, 5 ch 30 SLA 1997; am §§ 6, 7 ch 59 SLA 1997; am § 2 ch 27 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 90 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 86 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.07.030.
Responsibilities of the legislature. [Repealed, § 9 ch 27 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 37.07.040.
Office of management and budget.

The Alaska office of management and budget shall

assist the governor in meeting the requirements of AS

37.07.020

, including the coordination and analysis of state agency goals and objectives, plans, and budget requests;

prepare for submission to the governor an annually updated six-year capital improvements program and the proposed capital improvements budget for the coming fiscal year, the latter to include individual project justification with documentation of estimated project cost;

develop procedures to produce the information needed for effective policy decision making, including procedures to provide for the dissemination of information about plans, programs, and budget requests to be included in the annual budget and opportunity for public review and comment during the period of budget preparation;

assist state agencies in their statement of goals and objectives to achieve, among other things, the legislature’s mission and desired results, preparation of plans, assessments of the extent to which missions and desired results have been achieved, budget requests, and reporting of program performance; all documents forwarded by the office to a state agency containing instructions for the preparation of program plans and budget requests and the reporting of program performance are public information after the date they are forwarded;

administer its responsibilities under the program execution provisions of this chapter so that the policy decisions and budget determinations of the governor and the legislature are implemented;

provide the legislative finance division with the budget information it may request;

provide the legislative finance division with an advance copy of the governor’s budget workbooks at least seven days before the legislature convenes in a regular session;

prepare the proposed capital improvements budget for the coming fiscal year evaluating both state and local requests from the standpoint of need, equity, and priorities of the jurisdiction; other factors such as project amounts, population, local financial match, federal funds being used for local match, municipality or unincorporated community acceptance of the facility, and all associated costs of the facility may be considered;

for each department in the executive branch, report to the legislature by the 45th day of each regular session the amount of money appropriated to the department that is expected to lapse into the general fund at the end of the current fiscal year;

establish and administer a state agency program performance management system involving planning, performance budgeting, performance measurement, and program evaluation; the office shall ensure that information generated under this system is useful for managing and improving the efficiency and effectiveness of agency operations;

by January 15, list each lease-purchase agreement entered into by an agency during the immediately preceding fiscal year for the acquisition of equipment or other personal property, together with a description of the property acquired and financial details, including the purchase price, the term for payments, the amount of each payment, and the amount of interest or financing charges paid;

work with state agencies to develop a standardized methodology to collect and store energy consumption and expense data.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 3 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 60 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 16 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 2 SLA 1982; am §§ 5, 6 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 6 ch 30 SLA 1997; am § 8 ch 59 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 27 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 52 SLA 2003; am § 11 ch 34 SLA 2007; am § 3 ch 86 SLA 2008; am § 3 ch 105 SLA 2008; am § 11 ch 83 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For duty of legislative finance division to cooperate with office of budget and management in establishing a comprehensive system for state budgeting and financial management as set out in this chapter, see AS

24.20.231

(4).

For obligation of the office to develop a standard methodology to collect and store the data described in paragraph (12) of this section, see § 39, ch. 83, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 37.07.045.
Debt affordability analysis.

The Department of Revenue shall prepare a report that includes an inventory of state bonded debt, an estimate of state bonded debt that will be acquired within the next three years, and an evaluation of debt affordability. The report must conform to rating agency requirements for a debt affordability study. By January 31 each year, the report must be provided to the legislature for use in budget planning and made available to the public.

History.

(§ 4 ch 86 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.07.050.
Agency program and financial plans; mission statements.

The agencies shall assure the development of a statewide system of results-based government designed to increase efficiency and effectiveness of state programs and services. Toward that end, each state agency shall, on a semi-annual basis, identify results-based measures that have been used to work toward achievement of the mission statement and desired results issued by the legislature and of other goals of the agency, and set out the results as measured. Each state agency shall also prepare information that shall be compiled and submitted on December 15 each year to the office, the legislature, and the legislative finance division; this information must

identify the agency mission and desired results established by the legislature;

identify the goals and objectives the agency will use to achieve the legislature’s mission and desired results;

set out the results of any user group surveys and, if the results do not agree with the mission and desired results, goals, and objectives, explain why;

include written, defined methods of measuring results that apply to the responsibilities, products, and services of the agency;

identify results-based measures that have been used to work toward achievement of the mission statement and desired results issued by the legislature and other goals of the agency and set out the results as measured;

identify surveys or other methods of gathering user group opinions that have been used by the agency to identify ways to improve its programs;

identify methods of measuring performance when the mission statement and desired results issued by the legislature involve more than one agency and make recommendations to eliminate duplication of government functions and waste;

identify ways in which the agency has involved its employees in the development of methods of measuring results, including opportunities for employee representatives to participate in committees established to develop methods of measuring results;

include the budget requested to carry out the agency’s proposed plans in the succeeding fiscal year, including information reflecting the expenditures during the last fiscal year, the expenditures authorized for the current fiscal year, the expenditures proposed for the succeeding fiscal year, an explanation of the services to be provided, the number of total positions for all persons employed or under contract by the agency for personal services including those rendered for capital improvement projects, the need for the services, the cost of the services, and other information requested by the office;

include a report of agency receipts during the last fiscal year, an estimate of receipts during the current fiscal year, and an estimate of receipts for the succeeding fiscal year;

identify legislation required to implement the proposed programs and financial plans;

include an evaluation of the advantages and disadvantages of specific alternatives to existing or proposed agency activities or administrative methods;

prioritize the activities of the agency from the most important to the least important.

The state agency proposals prepared under (a) of this section must describe the relationships of their program services to those of other agencies, of other governments, and of nongovernmental bodies.

The office shall assist agencies in the preparation of their proposals under (a) of this section. This assistance may include technical assistance, organization of materials, centrally collected accounting, budgeting and personnel information, standards and guidelines formulation, population and other required data, and any other assistance that will help the state agencies produce the information necessary for efficient agency management and effective decision-making by the governor and the legislature.

If any state agency fails to transmit the program and financial information provided under (a) of this section on the specified date, the office may prepare the information.

The office shall compile and submit to the governor-elect in any year when a new governor has been elected, not later than November 20, a summary of the program and financial information prepared by state agencies.

Budget requests for boards and commissions and for those agency programs for the fiscal year following termination under AS 44.66 shall be prepared and submitted. The recommended appropriation request must include

an identification of the objectives intended for the program and the problem or need that the activities and operations of the board, commission, or program is intended to address;

an assessment of the degree to which the original objectives of the program have been achieved expressed in terms of performance, effects, or accomplishments of the program and of the program or need that it was intended to address;

a statement of the performance and accomplishments of the program in each of the last four completed fiscal years and of the costs incurred in the operation of the program;

a statement of the number and types of persons affected by operation of the program;

a summary statement, for each of the last three completed fiscal years, of the number of personnel employed in carrying out the program and a summary of the cost of personnel employed under contract in carrying out the program;

an assessment of the effect of the program on the economy of the state;

an assessment of the degree to which the overall policies of the program, as expressed in regulations adopted by the agency, board, or commission and its decisions, meet the objectives of the legislature in establishing the program;

an analysis of the services and performance estimated to be achieved if the life of the agency, board, or commission were to be continued;

a prioritized list of the activities the agency, board, or commission would be expected to perform if the life of the agency, board, or commission were to be continued, from the most important to the least important.

All goals and objectives, plans, programs, estimates, budgets, and other documents forwarded to the office of management and budget by a state agency under this section are public information after the date they are forwarded.

Each agency shall, with participation of its employees, develop methods for measuring agency results. A group or committee established by an agency to develop methods of measuring results shall include a representative of each of the bargaining units that represents employees of the agency.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 149 SLA 1977; am § 6 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 28 ch 63 SLA 1983; am §§ 4, 5 ch 27 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 98 SLA 2002)

Sec. 37.07.060.
Governor’s recommendation.

The governor shall formulate the operating and capital budget, capital improvements program, and fiscal plan required to be recommended to the legislature by AS

37.07.020

after considering the state agency proposed program and financial plans prepared in accordance with AS

37.07.050

, and other programs and alternatives that the governor considers appropriate. The plans must include the governor’s recommended missions and results, recommended strategies to implement the missions and results, recommended measures for determining whether the missions and desired results are achieved, including an assessment of whether prior year missions and desired results have been achieved, recommended operating program for the succeeding fiscal year, recommended capital improvements program for the succeeding six fiscal years, recommended programs for the upgrading of public buildings and facilities prepared in accordance with AS

35.10.015

, and recommended revenue measures to support the programs.

The governor shall present the proposed comprehensive operating and capital improvements programs, and fiscal plan if it is required under AS

37.07.020(b)

, in a message to a joint session of the legislature before the fourth legislative day following the convening of the legislature in regular session. The message must be accompanied by an explanatory report that summarizes recommended goals, plans, and appropriations. The report must contain

the coordinated program goals and objectives that the governor recommends to guide the decisions on the proposed program plans and budget appropriations;

the governor’s operating program and budget recommendations for the succeeding fiscal year organized by agency as required by AS

37.07.020(a)

;

the governor’s capital improvements program and budget recommendations for the succeeding fiscal year and capital improvements program for the succeeding six fiscal years, which must include

a description of each project, its estimated cost for the year construction is to start and the estimated cost of the project adjusted for inflation over the estimated period of construction, and the source of financing for the project; the project description for a new building or a new facility or for a major addition to a building or facility should include a site plan, preliminary drawings, and architect’s or engineer’s total cost estimate for the project;

a summary of projects previously authorized and not yet completed;

a summary, listed by agency, of all previously proposed projects that have been deferred beyond the six years covered by the plan and the year in which construction has been rescheduled to begin;

a forecast of the debt structure of the state and the various debt ratios over the life of the state’s bonds outstanding, bonds authorized and to be issued, and bond authorizations recommended in the plan;

a description of additional revenue measures needed to finance the plan in lieu of debt;

bond election bills to authorize the bonds required to fund the projects scheduled for the first three years of the plan;

projections of population of the state and its regions and communities;

economic data and projections necessary for the evaluation of the plan;

a summary of state receipts in the last fiscal year, a revised estimate for the current fiscal year, and an estimate for the succeeding fiscal year;

a summary of expenditures during the last fiscal year, those authorized for the current fiscal year, and an estimate for the succeeding fiscal year;

any additional information that will facilitate understanding of the governor’s proposed programs and financial plans by the legislature and the public.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 7 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 96 SLA 1980; am § 5 ch 2 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 27 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 86 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.07.062.
Capital budget.

Each appropriation bill authorizing capital expenditures required to be submitted to the legislature in AS

37.07.020(a)

must be accompanied by documents supporting the expenditures. The documents must list, for each project, the

project identification number;

project title;

source of funding;

amount expended on the project during the preceding fiscal year, the amount authorized for the current fiscal year, the amount proposed to be expended during the succeeding fiscal year, and the amount proposed to be expended each year until project completion;

estimated start for construction;

cost of each subsequent phase with estimated construction start and completion dates, for projects that will be completed in phases; and

schedule of bond elections pertaining to the appropriation, including elections previously held.

[Repealed, § 19 ch 61 SLA 2014.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 61 SLA 2014.]

[Repealed, § 19 ch 61 SLA 2014.]

History.

(§ 8 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 62 ch 14 SLA 1987; am §§ 7, 8 ch 30 SLA 1997; am §§ 9, 10 ch 59 SLA 1997; am §§ 8, 19 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Sec. 37.07.070.
Legislative review.

The legislature shall consider the governor’s proposed comprehensive operating and capital improvements programs, and fiscal plan if it is required under AS

37.07.020(b)

, evaluate alternatives to the plans, make program selections among the various alternatives, and determine, subject to available revenues, the level of funding required to support authorized state services. The presiding officer of each house may refer the fiscal plan to one or more committees. If the fiscal plan is referred, the first committee of referral shall hold at least one hearing on it. The operating and capital budgets of each agency shall be separately reviewed. During each regular session of the legislature, legislative review of the governor’s supplemental appropriation bills and the governor’s budget amendments are governed by the following time limits:

requests by the governor for supplemental appropriations for state agency operating and capital budgets for the current fiscal year may be introduced by the rules committee only through the 15th legislative day;

requests by the governor for budget amendments to state agency budgets for the budget fiscal year may be received and reviewed by the finance committees only through the 30th legislative day.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1977; am § 9 ch 168 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 2 SLA 1982; am §§ 7, 8 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 9 ch 30 SLA 1997; am § 11 ch 59 SLA 1997; am § 12 ch 12 SLA 2007; am § 6 ch 86 SLA 2008)

Sec. 37.07.080.
Program execution.

Except as limited by executive decisions of the governor, the mission statements and desired results issued by the legislature, appropriations by the legislature, and other provisions of law, the several state agencies have full authority for administering their program service assignments and are responsible for their proper management.

Each state agency shall prepare an annual plan for the operation of each of its assigned programs except for programs that are exempted from this requirement by the office. The operations plan shall be prepared in the form and content and be transmitted on the date prescribed by the office.

The office shall

review each operations plan to determine that it is consistent with the executive decisions of the governor, the mission statement and desired results issued by the legislature, appropriations by the legislature, and other provisions of law, that it reflects proper planning and efficient management methods, and that appropriations have been made for the legislatively established purpose and will not be exhausted before the end of the fiscal year;

approve the operations plan if satisfied that it meets the requirements under (1) of this subsection; otherwise, the office shall require revision of the operations plan in whole or in part.

A state agency may not increase the salaries of its employees, employ additional employees, or expend money or incur obligations except in accordance with law and a properly approved operations plan.

Transfers or changes between objects of expenditures or between allocations may be made by the head of an agency upon approval of the office. Transfers may not be made between appropriations, including transfers made through the use of a reimbursable service agreement or other agreement, except as provided in an act making the transfers between appropriations. However, a reimbursable service agreement or other agreement may be used to finance the provision of a service if

the agency that requires the service has, by law, the authority to obtain or provide the service and has an appropriation that may be used for that purpose; and

the agency that provides the service bills the agency administering the available funds based on

the actual cost to provide the service; or

a cost allocation method approved by the office.

The office shall report quarterly to the governor and the legislature on the operations of each state agency, relating actual accomplishments to those planned and modifying, if necessary, the operations plan of any agency for the balance of the fiscal year.

The governor may direct the withholding or reduction of appropriations to a state agency at any time during the fiscal year only if the governor determines that the planned expenditures can no longer be made due to factors outside the control of the state which make the expenditure factually impossible.

The increase of an appropriation item based on additional federal or other program receipts not specifically appropriated by the full legislature may be expended in accordance with the following procedures:

the governor shall submit a revised program to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for review;

45 days shall elapse before commencement of expenditures under the revised program unless the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee earlier recommends that the state take part in the federally or otherwise funded activity;

should the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee recommend within the 45-day period that the state not initiate the additional activity, the governor shall again review the revised program and if the governor determines to authorize the expenditure, the governor shall provide the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee with a statement of the governor’s reasons before commencement of expenditures under the revised program.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 26 SLA 1976; am §§ 2, 3 ch 74 SLA 1977; am §§ 4, 5 ch 60 SLA 1979; am §§ 9 — 12 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1994; am §§ 7 — 9 ch 27 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (g) was reorganized to reflect the 1998 repeal of former paragraph (g)(2).

Cross references. —

For definition of “program receipts” applicable to this section, see AS

37.05.146

.

For a temporary exception to the revised program legislative process for certain appropriation items, see sec. 12, ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For report on ch. 26, SLA 1976 (HB 760 am S), see 1976 House Journal, p. 388.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Vesting authority in the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee to approve transfers between appropriation items violates the separation of powers doctrine and is an improper delegation of a legislative function to an interim committee. July 22, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 13(3) of the 1976 budget bill, which authorized the Budget and Audit Committee to supervise the governor’s execution of the budget act, specifically over that portion of it which permitted him to transfer appropriation items, constituted an encroachment on executive power and offended the Alaska Constitution.
July 22, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.07.090.
Performance reporting. [Repealed, § 9 ch 27 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 37.07.100.
Proposed supplemental or special appropriations.

The governor from time to time may transmit to the legislature proposed supplemental or special appropriations in accordance with AS

37.07.070

which in the governor’s judgment are necessary.
However, if the governor finds that an emergency situation necessitates the proposal of supplemental or special appropriations, the governor may transmit them to the legislature at any time.
The governor shall accompany each proposal with a statement of the reasons for it, including the reasons for its omission from the budget.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 13 ch 63 SLA 1983)

Sec. 37.07.110.
Interpretation of chapter.

This chapter shall be construed as supplemental to all other state laws not in conflict with it.
If a section or part of a section of this chapter is in conflict with federal requirements for a program for which federal grant-in-aid funds are available, the section or part, to the extent of the conflict, is inoperative.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970)

Sec. 37.07.120.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“agency” means a department, officer, institution, board, commission, bureau, division, or other administrative unit forming the state government and includes the Alaska Pioneers’ Home, the Alaska Veterans’ Home, and the University of Alaska, but does not include the legislature or the judiciary;

“allocation” means an amount set out as a legislative guideline for expenditure by a state agency for a stated purpose within the total amount of an appropriation;

“appropriation” means a maximum amount available for expenditure by a state agency for a stated purpose set out in an appropriation act;

“capital projects” and “capital improvements” mean an allocation or appropriation item for an asset with an anticipated life exceeding one year and a cost exceeding $25,000 and include land acquisition, construction, structural improvement, engineering and design for the project, and equipment and repair costs;

“facility operations” means activities and expenses relating to the day-to-day operations of a building or facility, including utilities, janitorial service, security service, snow removal, and direct supervision of related maintenance activities;

“fiscal year” means a year beginning on July 1 of one calendar year and ending on June 30 of the following calendar year;

“maintenance and repair” means the day-to-day scheduled and preventive maintenance effort, including minor repair work, required to keep a building or facility operational and in a continuous state of readiness;

“object of expenditure” means a line item of expenditure within an allocation or an appropriation;

“office” means the Alaska office of management and budget established in the Office of the Governor by AS

44.19.141

;

“renewal and replacement” means the scheduled replacement of worn-out major building components and the replacement or retrofitting of obsolete or inefficient building systems in order to maintain or extend the life of a building or facility.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970; am § 4 ch 26 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 97 SLA 1976; am § 7 ch 46 SLA 1977; am §§ 14, 26 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 90 SLA 1998; am § 9 ch 59 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1983 to alphabetize the defined terms. Paragraphs (5) and (7) were enacted as (8) and (9), respectively. Renumbered in 1998, at which time former (5)-(7) were renumbered as (6), (8), and (9), respectively.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The University of Alaska is subject to the provisions of this chapter.
February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 37.07.130.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Executive Budget Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 188 SLA 1970)